Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska88-533
Increase in storage capacity; requirements; fees.

No warehouse licensee shall increase storage capacity without first obtaining the approval of the commission and effecting such revisions in its security as may be required by the commission. Additional fees may be imposed for increases in storage capacity or for any other changes in the license in such reasonable amounts as may be prescribed by the commission.

Laws 1987, LB 164, § 9.